Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-484] Transfer by the department of
education. The department of education may transfer a minor to the minor's
home school if the minor has been enrolled in a school based on an invalid
caregiver affidavit. [L 2003, c 99, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next